



SCANNER TECHNOLOGIES CORP Minneapolis MN, 55414 - Cortera Company Profile
















cortera. business directory



Create
								Account
Login
Developers





Search Cortera for a Business









State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Puerto Rico
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming














Home
Business
							Directory
Construction Special Trade Contractors
Scanner Technologies Corp
Cortera Support: 866-589-0664







Scanner Technologies Corp



125 Se Main St, Ste 270

Minneapolis,
							
							
							 MN
							
							
							 55414-2143
							
							 |  view map


(763) 476-8271

www.scannertech.com


						Looking for more information? Sign
							up for FREE!







Company Overview

SCANNER TECHNOLOGIES CORP is in the Plumbing, Heating, and Air-Conditioning industry in Minneapolis, MN.  This company currently has approximately 10 to 20 employees 













Company Details

Location Type:
						Single Location
					

Industry:
						Plumbing, Heating, and Air-Conditioning
					

Ownership: Private
						
					

Year Founded:
						1990
					

Employees:
						10 to 20


     
    
   
  

						Have fresher information?  Update
















Latest Company News







READ ALL COMPANY NEWS IN THE
									COMPLETE COMPANY CREDIT REPORT







Recent Company Alerts

Credit Risk Increase
No


Overall Payments
No


Peer Payments
No


Public Records
No


Financial News
No












								Alerts on more than 5,000 companies today,
								including:
							

Walbro


Mitchell Industrial Contractors Inc


Ideal Construction CO


Hammer & CO


Coats Electric CO Inc


Barnes & Noble


University of Alaska Fairbanks


Montgomery Marine Repair


RAM Enterprises Inc


Southern Cleaning Service Inc








Community Payment Ratings
















								LATEST COMMUNITY REVIEWS OF THIS COMPANY
								
							

Cortera is much more than an awesome business
									directory! It's an active community where real business people
									share the real deal on real businesses.

It's invaluable intel
										that's now available for FREE.



Get the inside scoop with ratings and reviews on Scanner Technologies Corp
Rate Scanner Technologies Corp on their
										payment behavior
									
Ask your network about Scanner Technologies Corp
										with Cortera Circles
									


Join
										the Cortera Community for free today.
								








The information contained in this company profile is compiled from third party sources, including but not limited to public records, user submissions, and other commercially available data sources. These sources may not be accurate, complete, or up-to-date. 
Cortera makes no representations or warranties regarding, and assumes no responsibility for, the accuracy, completeness, or currency of the information contained herein. 
Cortera products are enabled by SOFIE™, our proprietary technology platform for rapid data processing, robust analytics and flexible data access.











© 2017 Cortera, Inc. All rights reserved.

Sitemap





Cortera Support: 866-589-0664 |
How Does it Work? |
Who
					Do We Help? |
Company Profiles |
Community
				|
Media
				|
About






Today's
					Hot Company Profiles

VOGUE
VOLTAIRE
W & B TRUCKING INC
VOLATUS MAXIMUS LLC
VOGT JAMES B MD
VORA SHAILESH C MD
VOLUME REVERSAL SURVEY
VUDEN INC
VOORHEES ARIZONA TASTE INC
VOLUNTEERS OF AMERICA INC

More
							Today's Hot Companies »



Recently
					Updated Companies

JL LOPER CONSTRUCTION
CROSS COUNTY BANCSHARES INC
ADVENT I LLC
GOODY 2 SHOES
POWERHOUSE INDUSTRIAL SUPPLY INC
SPIRES PHILLIP CONSTRUCTION
CONTORNO INC
WESTERN SUN SHUTTLE INC
L & L MACHINE TOOL
AIR CONDITIONING SEC

More
								Recently Updated Companies »



Recently
					Rated Company Profiles

GLOBAL MERCHANDISING INC
SUNSTAR HEATING & AIRE
SLT EXPRESS WAY INC
LAW OFFICES OF SUSAN M SCHAUF
JR BALL CONTRACTING GROUP INC
AZURADISC
PANALPINA INC
MD THOMAS CONSTRUCTION LLC
IDEAL TRUE VALUE INC
STINGER WELDING INC

More
								Recently Rated Companies »



Industry Directory




Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy





 
  
 

 

  
















Component Inspection Support - SCANNERTECH LLC












HOME   
      PRODUCTS   
        SUPPORT   
        CONTACT US



 



Support
 
SCANNERTECH
        LLC provides support, software, repairs and upgrades for the UltraVim
        component inspection products. We
        provide spares and replacement parts including reticles, LED boards,
        frame grabber boards and power supplies for 3D coplanarity inspection
        modules and 2D bent lead inspection systems. Our software and hardware
        can also be used to upgrade or replace existing component defect
        inspection systems.
 
If
        you have question or problem, feel free to call us or send an email with your
        question or a description of the problem.
 
        

 
         

 
        
 
         
         



Š
        2016 SCANNERTECH LLC | 5026 S ROOSEVELT ST, TEMPE, ARIZONA, 85282 | All
        Rights Reserved.






3D BGA / Lead Inspection Modules - SCANNERTECH LLC












HOME   
      PRODUCTS   
        SUPPORT   
        CONTACT US








Featured
        Products
 







UX-46MM
        - 3D COPLANARITY INSPECTION  MODULE
The UltraVim
        3D inspection module uses vision cameras to perform 3D coplanarity
        inspections. The module calculates 3D BGA inspections and 3D lead
        inspections in seconds. Optional golden device units can be used to
        verify accuracy.







VX-46MM
        - 3D COPLANARITY
        INSPECTION  MODULE
The UltraVim
        VX module can perform 3D coplanarity inspection and bent lead inspection
        on a variety of leaded device packages including QFP, TSOP and J-Lead devices. Standard device file libraries provide for easy setup and training.








3D-35MM
        - 3D INSPECTION  MODULE
The UltraVim
        3D module can inspect a variety of leaded device packages including BGA,
        CSP, QFP, TSOP and SOIC packages in three dimensions using stereo
        cameras and advanced lighting.







3D-40MM
        - 3D COPLANARITY INSPECTION  MICROSCOPE
The UltraVim 3D Microscope can inspect a variety of semiconductor packages including QFP, TSOP and SOP devices in three dimensions.
        Devices are placed on the glass and tested in real time.







2D-30MM - LEAD INSPECTION  SYSTEM
The UltraVim
        2D system uses a machine vision camera to provide defect inspection, mark
        inspection and other 2D inspections. Standard device file libraries are included and the
        click and go interface allows users to setup the system in seconds.







2M-30MM - LEAD INSPECTION  SYSTEM
The UltraVim
        2M system uses a machine vision camera to provide defect inspection, mark
        inspection and other inspections. Optional software can be used to
        quickly find XY and theta positions for a variety of devices and
        packages.




Š
        2016 SCANNERTECH LLC | 5026 S ROOSEVELT ST, TEMPE, ARIZONA, 85282 | All
        Rights Reserved.





3D Coplanarity Inspection Modules - SCANNERTECH LLC












HOME   
        PRODUCTS   
        SUPPORT   
        CONTACT US



 



Welcome!
 
SCANNERTECH LLC is a world leader in
        3D coplanarity inspection technology. We provide unique and innovative inspection solutions for the semiconductor industry.
 
Our
        UltraVim inspection modules can perform 3D lead inspection and 3D BGA
        inspection on most semiconductor packages, and lead the industry in accuracy, reliability, speed, and ease-of-use.
 
 We also offer products for mark inspection, alignment and can
        provide custom solutions to meet your specific requirements. Contact us today to solve your inspection needs.
 

        
        
      
 


 
        

 
         



Š
        2016 SCANNERTECH LLC | 5026 S ROOSEVELT ST, TEMPE, ARIZONA, 85282 | All
        Rights Reserved.






















SCANNER TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION v. ICOS VISION SYSTEMS CORPORATION | FindLaw

























Not a Legal Professional?  Visit our consumer site

Register | Login
Welcome.Edit Your Profile | Log Out
Javascript is disabled. Please enable Javascript to log in.







Search




Cases & Codes
Practice Management
Jobs & Careers
Newsletters
Blogs
Law Technology




Forms
Lawyer Marketing
Corporate Counsel
Law Students
JusticeMail
Reference




















FindLaw
Caselaw
United States
US Fed. Cir.
SCANNER TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION v. ICOS VISION SYSTEMS CORPORATION

SCANNER TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION v. ICOS VISION SYSTEMS CORPORATION




ResetAA
Font size:
Print







United States Court of Appeals,Federal Circuit.
SCANNER TECHNOLOGIES CORPORATION, Plaintiff-Appellant, v. ICOS VISION SYSTEMS CORPORATION N.V., Defendant-Appellee.Scanner Technologies Corporation, Plaintiff-Appellant, v. Icos Vision Systems Corporation N.V., Defendant-Appellee.
Nos. 2007-1399, 2008-1081.
    Decided: June 19, 2008

		Before MICHEL, Chief Judge, CLEVENGER, Senior Circuit Judge, and GAJARSA, Circuit Judge.Kurt J. Niederluecke, Fredrikson & Byron, P.A., of Minneapolis, MN, argued for plaintiff-appellant.   With him on the brief were Darren B. Schwiebert, and Laura L. Myers.   Of counsel on the brief for 2007-1399 was Vytas M. Rimas, Scanner Technologies Corporation, of Minneapolis, MN. Robert M. Kunstadt, R. Kunstadt, P.C., of New York, NY, argued for defendant-appellee.   With him on the brief was Ilaria Maggioni.   Of counsel on the brief was Bradford E. Kile, Kile, Goekjian, Reed & McManus PLLC, of Washington, DC.
This is an appeal from the United States District Court for the Southern District of New York in a patent infringement action that Scanner Technologies Corp. (“Scanner”) brought against ICOS Vision Systems Corp. (“ICOS”) in July 2000.   ICOS denied infringement and counterclaimed seeking a declaratory judgment of noninfringement, invalidity, and unenforceability.   After this court reviewed the district court's Markman ruling in a 2004 interlocutory appeal, Scanner Technologies Corp. v. ICOS Vision Systems Corp., N.V., 365 F.3d 1299, 1300 (Fed.Cir.2004) (“Scanner I ”), the district court, on remand, held a bench trial on infringement, validity and enforceability in March 2005.   The district court rendered its findings of fact and conclusions of law in a May 22, 2007 opinion.  Scanner Techs. Corp. v. Icos Vision Sys. Corp., N.V., 486 F.Supp.2d 330 (S.D.N.Y.2007) (“Scanner II ”).   The district court entered final judgment on June 1, 2007, finding the asserted patents unenforceable, invalid for obviousness, and not infringed.   The final judgment also included a provision that rendered related patents, derived from the same common parent application, unenforceable.   Scanner appeals the district court's final judgment.   For the reasons stated below, we affirm in part, reverse in part, and vacate in part.IThis case involves semiconductor technology and specifically processes to inspect electronic components, including ball array devices, ball grid arrays, chip scale packages, and bump on wafers (collectively “BGAs”).   BGAs are mounted on circuit boards that can be found in various electronic devices, and are used to conduct electrical impulses in such devices.   The BGAs are comprised of an array of solder balls on a plane or substrate that conduct electrical impulses.   As noted in this court's opinion in Scanner I, 365 F.3d at 1300, it is important that the solder balls are positioned precisely at the same height.  “Even a minute difference in height could render the BGA, and thus the device, useless.”  Id.Inventors Elwin M. Beaty (“Beaty”) and David P. Mork (“Mork”) discovered an apparatus and method for the three-dimensional inspection of ball array devices in mid-1997 and filed a patent application, U.S. Appl. No. 09/321,805, on the apparatus and method in January 1998.   This January 1998 application is the “common parent application” to which the district court refers in its final judgment.   From this common parent application, divisional applications that would become U.S. Patent Nos. 6,064,756 (“the ′756 patent”) and 6,064,757 (“the ′757 patent”) (collectively, “the patents in suit”) were filed on May 28, 1999.   Scanner displayed its first embodiment of the method and apparatus-an inspection module called the Ultra Vim Plus (“UV+”)-in July 1998 at the Semicon West trade show in San Jose, California, and again in December 1998 at the Semicon Japan trade show.ICOS representatives were attendees of these trade shows, and interacted with Scanner representatives on at least one occasion.   Based at least in part on what ICOS observed at the trade shows, ICOS engaged Scanner in preliminary discussions regarding ICOS's interest in licensing or acquiring Scanner's BGA technology.   ICOS eventually abandoned those pursuits in light of its own progress in developing a 3D BGA inspection system.   In January 1999, ICOS announced its CyberSTEREO 3D BGA inspection product.   The CyberSTEREO was an outgrowth and replacement of ICOS's older BGA inspection product, the ICOS Projector.   The Projector had been on the market since 1996, and used a two-camera system with a structured light from a projector to inspect BGAs. Literature for the Projector system explained the use of a triangulation principle to perform three-dimensional measurements, including the use of Z calibration and bilinear interpolation.   Whereas the Projector system measured the absolute value of the top of the balls of the BGAs, the CyberSTEREO eliminated the projector and implemented a two-camera system to measure coplanarity, i.e., whether the balls were lying in the same plane.   To accomplish this measurement, the CyberSTEREO measures a point inside the ball rather than the top of the ball.By February 1999, Scanner learned that ICOS had launched the competing CyberSTEREO 3D BGA inspection product.   In Scanner's view, ICOS's new product infringed the proposed claims of Scanner's patent applications.   Consequently, while the applications were pending, Scanner submitted a petition to make special to the Commissioner of Patents and Trademarks at the United States Patent and Trademark Office (“PTO”).   The purpose of such a petition is to seek accelerated review of the pending application.1  In its petition, Scanner's patent attorney, George A. Leone (“Leone”) submitted that the application was entitled to special handling status because of actual infringement.   The petition contained all the prerequisites that the PTO requires, including Leone's statement that a “rigid comparison” of the alleged infringing method with the claims of the application had been made, and that in Leone's opinion, some of the claims are “unquestionably infringed.”   The petition was accompanied by a statement from the applicant and assignee, Beaty, describing the claimed invention, his role in the invention, certain interactions between Scanner and ICOS, and ICOS's competing system.   The PTO granted Scanner's petition and advanced the application process.   Literature describing the Projector system was considered by the PTO Examiner as prior art to the patents in suit, and the claims were considered patentable over the system as described in the literature.The PTO issued the patents in suit on May 16, 2000.   The ′756 patent is entitled “Apparatus for three dimensional inspection of electronic components.”   As the patent's Abstract provides, the ′756 patent covers a three dimensional inspection apparatus for ball array devices, where the ball array device is positioned in a fixed optical system.   An illumination apparatus is positioned for illuminating the ball array device.   A first camera is disposed in a fixed focus position relative to the ball array device for taking a first image of the ball array device to obtain a characteristic circular doughnut shape image from a ball.   A second camera is disposed in a fixed focus position relative to the ball array device for taking a second image of the ball array device to obtain a side view image of the ball.   A processor applies triangulation calculations on related measurements of the first image and the second image to calculate a three dimensional position of the ball with reference to a pre-calculated calibration plane.  ′756 patent, Abstract.   Claim 1 of the ′756 patent reads:1.  A three dimensional inspection apparatus for ball array devices having a plurality of balls, wherein the ball array device is positioned in a fixed optical system, the apparatus comprising:a) an illumination apparatus positioned for illuminating the ball array device;b) a first camera disposed in a fixed focus position relative to the ball array device for taking a first image of the ball array device to obtain a characteristic circular doughnut shape image from at least one ball;c) a second camera disposed in a fixed focus position relative to the ball array device for taking a second image of the ball array device to obtain a side view image of the at least one ball;  andd) a processor, coupled to receive the first image and the second image, that applies triangulation calculations on related measurements of the first image and the second image to calculate a three dimensional position of the at least one ball with reference to a pre-calculated calibration plane.′756 patent, col. 18, ll. 34-53.The ′757 patent is entitled “Process for three dimensional inspection of electronic components.”   Corresponding to the ′756 patented apparatus, the ′ 757 patent covers a three dimensional inspection process for ball array devices positioned in a fixed optical system.   In the claimed process of the ′ 757 patent, the ball array device is illuminated and a first image of the ball array device is taken with a first camera disposed in a fixed focus position relative to the ball array device to obtain a characteristic circular doughnut shape image from a ball.   A second image of the ball array device is taken with a second camera disposed in a fixed focus position relative to the ball array device to obtain a side view image of the ball.   The first image and the second image are processed using a triangulation method to calculate a three dimensional position of the ball with reference to a pre-calculated calibration plane.′757 patent, Abstract.Mork assigned his rights in the patents to Beaty-the CEO and majority shareholder of Scanner.   Scanner holds an exclusive license to the patents in suit from Beaty, and the license includes the right to sue for infringement.IIScanner filed suit against ICOS on July 7, 2000, accusing ICOS's CyberSTEREO ball grid array inspection system of infringing the patents in suit.   ICOS filed an answer denying the substantive allegations contained in the complaint.   In its counterclaim, ICOS sought damages for unfair competition under the Lanham Act, common law unfair competition and trade disparagement, and tortious interference with advantageous business relations.   ICOS also asked the court to declare Scanner's ′756 and ′757 patents invalid, unenforceable, and not infringed by ICOS. The parties agreed that the case would rise and fall on claim 1 of the ′756 patent.In an interlocutory appeal in 2004, Scanner challenged the methodology employed by the district court in construing the terms “an illumination apparatus” and “illuminating,” and its substantive constructions of those terms.  Scanner I, 365 F.3d at 1302.   Scanner further challenged the district court's entry of summary judgment of non-infringement as based upon erroneous claim constructions.  Id. In that case, this court agreed with Scanner that the district court erred in limiting “an illumination apparatus,” and thus “illuminating,” to an apparatus containing only a single illumination source.  Id. at 1304.   We held that “an illumination apparatus” is properly construed to encompass one or more illumination sources because the patentee had not evinced a clear intent to limit the article “an” to a single illumination source in either the claims or specification of the ′756 patent.  Id. Because the district court's entry of summary judgment of non-infringement was premised upon an incorrect construction of these terms, we vacated the judgment and remanded the case for further proceedings.  Id. at 1306.IIIThe case is now back before us following proceedings on remand in which the district court conducted a bench trial on the issues of infringement, validity, and enforceability.ARegarding inequitable conduct, the district court took issue with Leone's statement in the petition that he had made a “rigid comparison” of the CyberSTEREO system with the claims of the application, when the district court found, based on Leone's deposition testimony, that Leone “had not actually seen the ICOS device, as suggested.”  Scanner II, 486 F.Supp.2d at 346.   Leone's statements were not the only basis for the court's finding of inequitable conduct;  the district court also found Beaty's statements in connection with the petition to make special to be problematic.   The district court stated:The UV+ was not on “open display” at the December 1998 trade show, at least not in the sense that Beaty tried to convey, for the system was in a black sealed box and an inspection of the module would not have revealed how the calculations were performed.   DeProft [ICOS's Vice President] did not visit the Scanner booth at the July 1998 trade show, as Beaty stated.   Contradicting what he wrote in his declaration, Beaty acknowledged at trial that he could not recall “anything specific” with respect to DeProft at that show.  (Tr. 205).   DeProft did not take “copious notes” or make any diagrams or drawings of the UV+ at the Japan trade show, as Beaty alleged as well.Scanner II, 486 F.Supp.2d at 346-347.The district court considered the trial testimony of Beaty and DeProft, and concluded that Beaty's statements 2 in the declaration accompanying the petition to make special suggested, and “were intended to mislead the PTO into believing,” that ICOS copied the Scanner device, when the court found that ICOS developed the CyberSTEREO from the Projector system on its own.  Id. at 347.BWith regard to obviousness, the district court enumerated what it accepted to be well known principles in the prior art, including illumination in camera-based systems, two-camera systems where one camera is disposed at an angle to another, use of triangulation calculations to make measurements, triangulation calculations utilized with a two-camera system, use of stereo vision, and the idea of calibrating cameras.   In view of those prior art principles, the district court concluded that ICOS's Projector system rendered Scanner's claims obvious.The district court explained that the Projector system contained a first and second camera, an illumination apparatus, and a processor coupled to the cameras to receive first and second images to find the three-dimensional position of at least one ball.  Scanner II, 486 F.Supp.2d at 347.   The court further concluded that one skilled in the art would have found it obvious at the time of the Scanner invention to employ the elements of the claims to alter the Projector system by removing the structured light source and employing triangulation calculations to locate the three-dimensional position of balls.   Id. Based on these findings, the district court entered final judgment that the claims of both patents in suit were invalid.COn infringement, the only element of Claim 1 of the ′756 patent in dispute was element d, as the parties agreed that the ICOS products comprise the preamble and elements a, b, and c. The district court observed that element d requires the use of triangulation calculations while the ICOS products rely on bilinear interpolation, which is the process of transferring the location of a ball from the 3D camera into the 2D camera and then computing a translation offset.   Bilinear interpolation involves the measurement of the position of a ball in the 3D camera, the relocation of that position in the 2D or top camera using a camera-to-camera transfer process, and a comparison of that position to the location of the ball as observed in the 2D camera.   The difference in the two positions is proportional to the height of the ball.   As the district court observed, bilinear interpolation is different from triangulation, as it is an algebraic operation rather than a trigonometric one.   In its use of bilinear interpolation, the ICOS system does not solve for unknown properties of a triangle and does not measure the height of the balls.Element d of claim 1 also requires the calculation of a three-dimensional position of at least one ball with reference to a pre-calculated calibration plane.   The district court understood the ICOS system to locate a reference point inside the ball as opposed to locating the X, Y, and Z values for the top of a ball.   Because the ICOS products rely on coplanarity-the relative variations of each ball from a plane, the district court found that ICOS's systems did not need to measure the height of the ball nor do they make calculations with reference to a pre-calculated calibration plane.   Absent the application of triangulation calculations on related measurements of the first image and the second image to calculate a three dimensional position with reference to a pre-calculated calibration plane, the district court concluded that the accused device did not infringe claim 1 of the ′756 patent.IVAScanner contends that the district court abused its discretion by ruling that the patents in suit are unenforceable due to inequitable conduct because the court “misapplied the law relating to materiality by incorrectly concluding that any statement in a petition to make special is per se material if the petition is granted.”Scanner argues that the statements adjudged to be misrepresentations were neither material to patentability nor to the grant of expedited review.   Further, Scanner submits that neither Beaty nor Leone made false or misleading statements.   Scanner contends that the record and the district court's opinion are devoid of any evidence and discussion of the required intent to deceive necessary to sustain a charge of inequitable conduct. The ultimate question of inequitable conduct is committed to the discretion of the district court and we review the court's determination that the patentee engaged in inequitable conduct for abuse of discretion.  Modine Mfg. Co. v. Allen Group, Inc., 917 F.2d 538, 541 (Fed.Cir.1990), cert. denied, 500 U.S. 918, 111 S.Ct. 2017, 114 L.Ed.2d 103 (1991).   An abuse of discretion occurs when (1) the court's decision is clearly unreasonable, arbitrary, or fanciful, (2) the court's decision is based on an erroneous construction of the law, (3) the court's factual findings are clearly erroneous, or (4) the record contains no evidence upon which the court rationally could have based its decision.  Nilssen v. Osram Sylvania, Inc., 504 F.3d 1223, 1229 (Fed.Cir.2007). In order to establish inequitable conduct, the party challenging the patent is required to establish by clear and convincing evidence that the patent applicant “(1) either made an affirmative misrepresentation of material fact, failed to disclose material information, or submitted false material information, and (2) intended to deceive the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office.”  Symantec Corp. v. Computer Assoc. Int'l, Inc, 522 F.3d 1279, 1296 (Fed.Cir.2008) (quoting Cargill, Inc. v. Canbra Foods, Ltd., 476 F.3d 1359, 1363 (Fed.Cir.2007)).   Both intent and materiality are questions of fact, and must be proven by clear and convincing evidence.   Young v. Lumenis, Inc., 492 F.3d 1336, 1344 (Fed.Cir.2007).   We review a district court's findings on the threshold issues of materiality and intent for clear error.  Pfizer, Inc. v. Teva Pharms. USA, Inc., 518 F.3d 1353, 1366 (Fed.Cir.2008).   Under the clear error standard, the court's findings will not be overturned in the absence of a “definite and firm conviction” that a mistake has been made.  Id. “Once threshold findings of materiality and intent are established, the district court must weigh them to determine whether the equities warrant a conclusion that inequitable conduct occurred.”  Flex-Rest, LLC v. Steelcase, Inc., 455 F.3d 1351, 1363 (Fed.Cir.2006) (quoting Purdue Pharma, 438 F.3d at 1128). Scanner argues that the district court erred in failing to assess materiality to patentability, and instead applied what it considers broad dicta in this court's decision in General Electro Music Corp. v. Samick Music Corp., 19 F.3d 1405, 1411 (Fed.Cir.1994).   In General Electro, we stated “as a matter of law that a false statement in a Petition to Make Special is material if ․ it succeeds in prompting expedited consideration of the application.”  Id. at 1411.   Scanner argues that in cases involving inequitable conduct since General Electro, the Federal Circuit has emphasized that a misrepresentation or omission must be material to patentability to support a charge of inequitable conduct. It is true that many of our cases, before and after General Electro, examine materiality in the context of whether the alleged inequitable conduct bore directly on patentability of the claims in suit.   That fact does not undercut the continuing force of the test for materiality in the setting of a petition to make special, or in other settings where an alleged misrepresentation to the Patent Office resulted in some action other than issuance of a patent.   For example, this court affirmed a district court's decision finding that all of the patents in suit were unenforceable due to inequitable conduct for improperly claiming small entity status.  Nilssen v. Osram Sylvania, Inc., 504 F.3d 1223, 1231 (Fed.Cir.2007) (stating that “it is not beyond the authority of a district court to hold a patent unenforceable for inequitable conduct in misrepresenting one's status as justifying small entity maintenance payments”).  Nilssen relied on Ulead Systems, Inc. v. Lex Computer & Management Corp., 351 F.3d 1139 (Fed.Cir.2003).   In Ulead, this court stated:Historically issues of unenforceability have arisen in cases involving inequitable conduct occurring in the prosecution of patents.   But, we see no reason why the doctrine should not extend into other contexts, like the present one, where the allegation is that inequitable conduct has occurred after the patent has issued and during the course of establishing and paying the appropriate maintenance fee.   In this context, it is equally important that the PTO receive accurate information from those who practice before it.Id. at 1144 (internal citations omitted).   Given the precedent cited above, we must reject Scanner's view that inequitable conduct cannot be shown absent a misrepresentation that bears on the patentability of the claims in the application.   When the setting involves a petition to make special, as is the case here, we reaffirm that a false statement that succeeds in expediting the application is, as a matter of law, material for purposes of assessing the issue of inequitable conduct.3 In this setting, the first question to address is whether the statements in question are false.   If not, materiality is lacking and there is no need to consider the intent prong of inequitable conduct.   Scanner argues that the district court failed to take the statements in Scanner's application to make special at face value in assessing their veracity, and instead drew unwarranted inferences from the statements, and deemed such inferences untrue.In Akron Polymer Container Corp. v. Exxel Container, Inc., 148 F.3d 1380 (Fed.Cir.1998), we reviewed a holding of inequitable conduct that was based on a patentee's failure to disclose codependency of related applications to one examiner when the other examiner had been apprised.   The district court had found that “only inferences of deceitful intent can be drawn from the joint prosecution of both applications by the same attorney.”  Id. at 1382.   In that case, we found clear error because the district court failed to give due weight to evidence of good faith that would call for inferences contrary to a finding of deceit. The rule of Akron Polymer is as clear as it is necessary.   Whenever evidence proffered to show either materiality or intent is susceptible of multiple reasonable inferences, a district court clearly errs in overlooking one inference in favor of another equally reasonable inference.   All reasonable inferences must be drawn from the evidence, and a judgment then rendered on the evidence as informed by the range of reasonable inferences.4  Where the rule is breached, no inequitable conduct may be found.   The rule is necessary, for without it findings of inequitable conduct, with the punishment of unenforceability of the entire patent, could wrongly stand.In this case, a full review of the record shows that the district court failed to draw all reasonable inferences on the factual findings relied upon by the district court to show materiality.   We will consider those findings in turn.1 The district court first addressed Leone's statement that he made a “rigid comparison” of the CyberSTEREO “system” with the claims of the application.   The court inferred that this statement “suggested” that Leone had actually seen the device, when in fact, he had not.   Hence, the district court deemed Leone to have made a false statement to the PTO.While it is not unreasonable to infer or expect that a rigid comparison could call for a physical inspection, a contrary inference of intended compliance with the PTO's regulation can just as easily be drawn.   The petition was accompanied with claims charts that referenced the specific source for Leone's beliefs as to each claimed element.   Most of Leone's citations were to ICOS's CyberSTEREO product literature-also submitted to the PTO as Exhibit C to the petition.   Ordinary dictionary definitions 5 of “rigid” do not connote that the term is synonymous to a physical inspection.Moreover, a physical inspection should not be an implied requirement for use of the phrase “rigid comparison” in a petition to make special in that, depending on the technology, and whether the claims are directed to an apparatus or a method, a physical inspection may not provide any more information than what can be ascertained from review of product literature.   In some cases, a review of source code may be the only way to make a comparison of an accused device to proposed patent claims, which cannot be accomplished by physical observation of a “black box” enclosing the hardware that stores the application generated by such source code.   The district court seemed to recognize as much when, in criticizing Beaty's use of the term “open display” to describe Scanner's system at a trade show, the court stated “the system was in a black sealed box and an inspection of the module would not have revealed how the calculations were performed.”  Scanner II, 486 F.Supp.2d at 347.Furthermore, the district court did not credit the fact that the “rigid comparison” words are not of Leone's creation.   The PTO's rules for the contents of a petition to make special require recitation of those words.   In sum, the district court's inference that Leone misleadingly suggested he saw the ICOS device, when weighed against a equally reasonable inference of good faith that the plain words of his statement and supporting material engenders, does not support the conclusion that the attorney's statement is misleading or false under the clear and convincing evidentiary standard.2The district court also found that the UV+ was not on “open display” at the December 1998 trade show, “at least not in the sense that Beaty tried to convey.”  Scanner II, 486 F.Supp.2d at 339.   The court apparently inferred from Beaty's statement that Scanner implied that its display of the UV+ revealed how calculations were performed.   As discussed above, however, even an unsealed and physically opened black box would not have necessarily revealed how Scanner performed those aspects of the process that utilized a processor.   One can just as reasonably infer from Beaty's statement that by use of the phrase “open display,” Scanner was communicating that the product could be viewed and demonstrated openly by visitors to the booth, as opposed to a private setting or one that might require non-disclosure agreements.   Beaty testified that when he said Scanner's device was on “open display,” such was to distinguish ICOS's closed method of display, which was to “keep their modules in locked cases where people could not get to them.”   Trial Tr. at 225, lines 5-6.Beaty further testified, regarding the open display, that “[w]e had ours completely open so people could move around it and see it and observe it.”   Id. at 225, lines 7-8.   In light of the requirement that inequitable conduct be found by clear and convincing evidence, the district court erred when it adopted an unfavorable inference regarding “open display,” over an equally reasonable favorable inference.3As a further example of a false statement to the PTO by Beaty, the district court found that DeProft did not visit the Scanner booth at the July 1998 trade show, as the district court held that Beaty had suggested.   On this issue, Beaty testified that he had no specific recollection of which ICOS personnel visited the Scanner booth, but he affirmed his honest belief that DeProft had visited the booth.   DeProft testified that he absolutely recalled attending the July trade show.   He could not recall speaking with Beaty or anyone else representing Scanner at the July show.   When asked if he had “any memory of seeing anything or learning of anything about Scanner at that trade show in July of 1998,” he replied “No. I do not.   In fact, I'm not sure whether Scanner had the booth there or had a system on display there.   I just don't-I cannot recall that.”   Although DeProft was sure he attended the July show, he was unsure whether or not he visited the Scanner booth.The testimony before the district court on the issue of whether DeProft visited the Scanner booth at the July trade show is susceptible of at least two possibilities:  either DeProft did visit the booth or he did not.   The memory of both witnesses was at best vague.6  Since it is uncontested that several ICOS employees visited the trade show, whether DeProft did or did not seems inconsequential.   But in any event, as with the alleged false statements examined above, here too the testimony is not one-sided.   The district court chose to infer from DeProft's testimony that he had not visited the booth.   But given the vague nature of the testimony, it would have been equally reasonable to infer that he had in fact visited it.   In the face of the clear and convincing evidence standard, the district court clearly erred in favoring DeProft's vague memory over Beaty's.4The district court also concluded, as a matter of fact, that DeProft did not take “copious notes” or make any diagrams or drawings of the UV+ at the Japan trade show, as Beaty stated in his declaration.   The district court credited DeProft's testimony over Beaty's in this regard.   The Supreme Court has instructed that, “[W]hen a trial judge's finding is based on his decision to credit the testimony of one of two or more witnesses, each of whom has told a coherent and facially plausible story that is not contradicted by extrinsic evidence, that finding, if not internally inconsistent, can virtually never be clear error.”  Honeywell Int'l, Inc. v. Hamilton Sundstrand Corp., 523 F.3d 1304, 1314 (Fed.Cir.2008) (quoting Anderson v. City of Bessemer City, 470 U.S. 564, 575, 105 S.Ct. 1504, 84 L.Ed.2d 518 (1985)) (emphasis added).   As Scanner points out, there is some inconsistency in the district court's assessment of the conflicting testimony because DeProft was forced to acknowledge on cross-examination that he had taken some notes-at least enough to have commented about Scanner's system in ICOS's internal correspondence.   Thus, the falsity or misleading nature of Beaty's statements and corresponding trial testimony comes down to whether the notes taken by DeProft were indeed “copious.”   What constitutes “copious” note-taking is a relative determination, from which subjective inferences, both favorable and unfavorable, can be deduced.   To the extent that the district court found that Beaty made a false statement based on an unfavorable inference presumed from the adjective he used to describe the amount of notes that were taken, the district court plainly erred.   We fail to see how such an inference constitutes the clear and convincing evidence necessary to support a finding of inequitable conduct.5Taking Beaty's statements, analyzed above, as a whole, the district court held that those statements “were intended to mislead the PTO into believing that ICOS had copied the Scanner invention based on what it saw at the trade shows.”  Scanner II, 486 F.Supp.2d at 346.   When the individual facts are properly assessed, with all reasonable inferences being drawn, there is no clear and convincing evidence that Scanner told the PTO that ICOS had copied its invention.   To be sure, Beaty's declaration stated that he believed that ICOS's product met the limitations of the claims in his application.   But such a belief leaves room for nothing more than the bare assertion of infringement.   The limitations of the claims can be met by slavish copying, or equally met by independent development of the accused products.   The record, when properly analyzed, reveals Scanner telling the PTO that it believed ICOS to infringe.   Under the clear error standard, Scanner cannot be held to have told the PTO that ICOS came by infringement by way of copying.When the record evidence in this case on the issue of whether Scanner made false statements to the PTO in its petition to make special is measured by the rule of Akron Polymer, the grounds supporting the district court's ultimate finding of materiality dissolves.   Because we hold that the district court clearly erred in its finding of materiality, the issue of intent to deceive the PTO is moot.   Consequently, we reverse the district court's determination that the patents in suit are unenforceable for inequitable conduct.7 B Scanner contends that the district court abused its discretion in awarding attorneys' fees and costs to ICOS because the court based its finding of an exceptional case on an erroneous finding of inequitable conduct.   We agree. Whether a case is exceptional under section 285 is a factual question reviewed for clear error.  Cybor Corp. v. FAS Techs., 138 F.3d 1448, 1460 (Fed.Cir.1998) (en banc).   The district court's decision to award attorney fees after finding a case exceptional is reviewed for abuse of discretion.  Id. As discussed above, the district court clearly erred in finding that Scanner submitted false material statements to the PTO. Because the district court's finding of inequitable conduct served as the essential foundation of its finding that this case was exceptional, the district court likewise erred in finding that this case was exceptional, and therefore abused its discretion in awarding attorney fees.   See Molins PLC v. Textron, Inc., 48 F.3d 1172, 1186 (Fed.Cir.1995).C We turn to the question of whether the district court correctly held that the claims in suit would have been obvious.   Scanner argues that the district court erred by first, failing to consider the level of ordinary skill in the art and the evidence of objective indicia of nonobviousness, and second, concluding that claim 1 would have been obvious without making factual findings that could support a conclusion that the prior art disclosed or suggested the actual elements of claim 1. Obviousness is a question of law based on underlying questions of fact.  Daiichi Sankyo Co., Ltd. v. Apotex, Inc., 501 F.3d 1254, 1256 (Fed.Cir.2007) (citing Winner Int'l Royalty Corp. v. Wang, 202 F.3d 1340, 1348 (Fed.Cir.2000)).   We therefore review the ultimate determination of obviousness by a district court de novo and the underlying factual inquiries for clear error.  Id. The underlying factual determinations made by the district court that this court must review for clear error include (1) the scope and content of the prior art, (2) the level of ordinary skill in the art, (3) the differences between the claimed invention and the prior art, and (4) objective indicia of non-obviousness.  Graham v. John Deere Co., 383 U.S. 1, 17, 86 S.Ct. 684, 15 L.Ed.2d 545 (1966). Scanner's arguments regarding the level of ordinary skill in the art and evidence of objective indicia of nonobviousness ring hollow.   We recognize that it is ICOS's burden to prove invalidity by clear and convincing evidence, and that that burden of proof never shifts to the patentee to prove validity.   Pfizer, Inc. v. Apotex, Inc., 480 F.3d 1348, 1359 (Fed.Cir.2007) (quoting Hybritech Inc. v. Monoclonal Antibodies, Inc., 802 F.2d 1367, 1375 (Fed.Cir.1986)). However, in this case, the record shows that ICOS adduced certain facts, which were unrebutted by Scanner and accepted by the district court as the fact finder.  Pfizer, 480 F.3d at 1360 (“[O]nce a challenger has presented a prima facie case of invalidity, the patentee has the burden of going forward with rebuttal evidence.”) (internal citations omitted);  Cable Elec. Prods. Inc. v. Genmark, Inc., 770 F.2d 1015, 1022 (Fed.Cir.1985) (“[I]f evidence is presented establishing a prima facie case of invalidity, the opponent of invalidity must come forward with evidence to counter the prima facie challenge to the presumption of section 282.”).   The district court cannot be said to have erred by not discussing those unrebutted facts. The district court has the responsibility to determine whether the challenger has met its burden by clear and convincing evidence by considering the totality of the evidence, including any rebuttal evidence presented by the patentee.  Pfizer, Inc. v. Apotex, Inc., 480 F.3d at 1360 (quoting Stratoflex, Inc. v. Aeroquip Corp., 713 F.2d 1530, 1534 (Fed.Cir.1983)).   The record shows that ICOS's expert, Dr. Mundy, testified to the level of ordinary skill in the art.   Scanner points to no contrary evidence, and its brief does not even dispute the level of ordinary skill that Dr. Mundy described.Further, the district court expressly considered the insinuation that ICOS copied, and explicitly rejected the idea.   In criticizing the district court's failure to consider any other evidence introduced at trial demonstrating the existence of objective indicia of nonobviousness, Scanner cites in its brief to 1) press releases that caution the reader not to place undue reliance on forward-looking statements such as expected contributions of the new product, 2) an email referring to a non-specific press release, and 3) an excerpt from the trial testimony in which counsel for Scanner sought to admit exhibits into the record going to commercial success but declining to “have discussions to make it go more quickly.”   In point of fact, there simply was not much evidence of secondary indicia of obviousness for the court to consider and discuss.   We therefore reject Scanner's argument that the district court erred by failing to consider the level of ordinary skill in the art and evidence of objective indicia of nonobviousness.Scanner argues that the district court erred in concluding that the ICOS Projector system disclosed or suggested each limitation of claim 1 because the district court issued no findings of fact capable of supporting its conclusion.   In support of its argument, Scanner points to the fact that the Projector system was the only prior art the court considered in invalidating the patents, and that the system was before the PTO, which found the claims to be patentable over the Projector system.   Specifically, Scanner argues that the district court did not find that the prior art disclosed or suggested the limitations of claim 1 as they actually appear, which would have required a finding that the Projector system or the knowledge of those of skill in the art contained or suggested calculation of a three-dimensional position of a ball with reference to a pre-calculated calibration plane.Scanner further argues that prior to its invention, “common sense dictated that a 3D calibration object, not a calibration plane, was needed to calibrate a 3D camera.”   Scanner then states that the “Projector taught that separate calibration devices were required to calibrate the two cameras and taught away from using an XY calibration reticle to calibrate the 3D camera.”   Scanner submits that the district court also did not find that the Projector system or the knowledge of those of skill in the art contained or suggested applying triangulation calculations on related measurements of the first image and the second image, obtained by the first and second cameras respectively, as is required by claim 1. Therefore, according to Scanner, “[t]he record contains no evidence that anything in the prior art or in the knowledge of one of skill in the art would have suggested implementing stereo triangulation calculations on related images in the Projector system.”ICOS responds that the district court found that the Projector system used “Z calibration,” a finding Scanner acknowledged.   ICOS submits that Z calibration is calibration with reference to a Z plane.   The trial testimony supports this contention.   ICOS's expert, Dr. Mundy, was asked whether the two cameras in the Projector system were calibrated using a single artifact.   Dr. Mundy replied, “Yes, they were.”   Trial Tr. at 758.   When asked how, Dr. Mundy explained, “They had a flat glass, a plate, which they called a caliber, something like that․ But basically it is a plane which they put under the field of view of both cameras and then carry out the calibration process that I just illustrated in my slides and in my analysis of the code.”  Id. (emphasis added).Further, ICOS points to Dr. Mundy's testimony as establishing that the use of two cameras in a stereo-vision arrangement was not new at the time of the alleged invention.   Specifically, Dr. Mundy testified that “․ the use of triangulation to determine information from the two cameras, the side 3D camera and the top camera, is something that's well known, or was well known at that time.   And actually stereo measurement of Sphinx had been done by the computer vision community perhaps a decade earlier.”   Dr. Mundy was then asked, “Based on that, at least in your opinion, to one skilled in the art, the concept of using stereo vision would be obvious with the existence of a projector system?”   He responded, “Well, it would have been obvious in any system that had two cameras, one at an angle with respect to the other.”   Trial Tr. at 756. With respect to Scanner's point that the district court does not identify the relational aspect of claim 1, we agree that one of ordinary skill in the art would understand that the relationship characteristic of triangulation is an ancient Greek discovery, and there can be no triangulation of mere unrelated measurements.   As the Supreme Court reaffirmed in KSR Int'l Co. v. Teleflex Inc., --- U.S. ----, 127 S.Ct. 1727, 1741, 167 L.Ed.2d 705 (2007), an obviousness analysis “need not seek out precise teachings directed to the specific subject matter of the challenged claim, for a court can take account of the inferences and creative steps that a person of ordinary skill in the art would employ.”   We recognize that claim 1 requires triangulation of measurements using a first image from the first camera and a second image from the second camera whereas the Projector system performs triangulation calculations on related measurements from images of only one camera.   However, the trial testimony shows that the relatively small logical gap between the prior art and the claim in this case is closed by a person of ordinary skill in the art “pursu[ing] known options within his or her technical grasp.”   See also In re Translogic Tech., Inc., 504 F.3d 1249, 1262 (Fed.Cir.2007).Scanner's arguments regarding obviousness appear to take more issue with the crisp nature of the district court's opinion rather than the merits of the obviousness determination, which are supported by the trial testimony of Dr. Mundy.   See Stratoflex, Inc. v. Aeroquip Corp., 713 F.2d 1530, 1540 (Fed.Cir.1983) (“We sit to review judgments, not opinions.”).   We agree with the district court's judgment and therefore affirm its conclusion that claim 1 of the ′756 patent would have been obvious in light of the prior art and the knowledge of one skilled in the art.D Scanner argues that the district court erred in holding that the CyberSTEREO does not infringe any claim of the patents in suit.   Infringement is a question of fact that, after a bench trial, we review for clear error.  Alza Corp. v. Mylan Labs., Inc., 464 F.3d 1286, 1289 (Fed.Cir.2006).   Under the clear error standard, a reversal is permitted only when this court is left with a definite and firm conviction that the district court was in error.  Id. (citing Medichem, S.A. v. Rolabo, S.L., 437 F.3d 1157, 1164 (Fed.Cir.2006)). According to Scanner, the district court applied a different and incorrect construction of the term “triangulation calculation” in its infringement analysis to conclude that the CyberSTEREO is not making or using triangulation calculations.   However, the record does support the conclusion that ICOS does not practice “triangulation” as the patents in suit use that term because ICOS relies on bilinear interpolation for measurement.Scanner also argues that the district court applied an incorrect construction of the claim term “pre-calculated calibration plane” since the district court arrived at the conclusion that the CyberSTEREO determines the X and Y coordinates on the Z=0 world plane.   The district court correctly applied the claim construction and properly determined that the coplanarity calculation in ICOS's system is different from the pre-calculated calibration plane in claim 1 of the ′756 patent.   Scanner identifies no basis for this court to disturb the district court's factual findings, most of which were based on crediting expert witness testimony.   We therefore affirm the district court's judgment of noninfringement of claim 1.EScanner also appeals the district court's ruling on the validity of unasserted claims of the patents in suit.   Scanner further contends that the district court erred in concluding that no claim of either patent-in-suit is infringed based on its analysis of only claim 1 of the ′756 patent. Scanner first argues that the district court lacked jurisdiction to adjudicate the unasserted claims because no case or controversy existed to support subject matter jurisdiction.   This argument is unpersuasive.   ICOS responded to Scanner's lawsuit with a counterclaim that sought a declaratory judgment on the claims of the ′756 and ′757 patents.   Def.'s Answer and Countercl. at 11 (“Count IV (Declaratory Judgment) ․ The ′ 756 and ′757 patents, and each of the claims thereof, are invalid and/or unenforceable for one or more of the reasons set forth in paragraphs (a) through (k) above.”).   Accordingly, the district court had subject matter jurisdiction to adjudicate claims that Scanner did not assert against ICOS. Scanner also argues that the district court erred in ruling on the validity of claims as to which ICOS presented no evidence.   ICOS responds that the case went to trial on claim 1 because the parties agreed to try the case on a representative claim upon which the entire case would stand or fall.   ICOS cites to the parties' stipulation “that the case stands and falls on Claim 1 of the ′756 Patent.”Scanner limits the import of the stipulation to claim construction.   The record does not include the stipulation itself, only acknowledgement by both parties that the stipulation had been made.   When asked at oral argument, neither party was aware of whether the stipulation was memorialized in writing or part of the record below. An interpretation of the parties' pretrial stipulation, much like contract interpretation, is a legal issue that this court reviews de novo.  Fuji Photo Film Co., Ltd. v. Jazz Photo Corp., 394 F.3d 1368, 1373 (Fed.Cir.2005) (citing Kearns v. Chrysler Corp., 32 F.3d 1541, 1545 (Fed.Cir.1994)).   Despite the black letter law that a finding of invalidity of an independent claim does not determine the validity of claims that depend from it, see 35 U.S.C. § 282 (1982), parties can stipulate to almost anything but jurisdiction.   This court's decision in Shelcore, Inc. v. Durham Indus., Inc., 745 F.2d 621 (Fed.Cir.1984), is instructive:While the rule-that where the patentability of dependent claims is not argued separately from the independent claims from which they depend, the former stand or fall with the latter-has vitality prior to the issuance of a patent embodying those claims, that rule has no application in a district court proceeding to determine whether the claims of an issued patent are valid.   While the above rule is not applicable as a rule of procedure in a district court, it has been applied on appeal from a district court judgment with respect to the claims of an issued patent as a matter of convenience.   The presumption of validity does not guide our analysis on appeal.   Rather, we review the findings and conclusions of a district court under the appropriate standards of review.   That circumstance bears no relation, however, to the requirement at trial that a party challenging the validity of a claim, absent a pretrial agreement or stipulation, must submit evidence supporting a conclusion of invalidity of each claim the challenger seeks to destroy.Id. at 624-25 (emphasis added).   In this case, we have an unambiguously proposed finding of fact that stated simply “ICOS and Scanner have stipulated that the case stands and falls on Claim 1 of the ′756 Patent,” to which Scanner replied, “True.” The pleadings represented that “the case” constituted allegations of infringement of both patents, and a declaratory judgment action seeking invalidity, noninfringement, and unenforceability of all the claims of the patent in suit.   Scanner's response to ICOS's proposed finding of fact and conclusions of law provided no caveat to its unqualified agreement with the nature of the parties' stipulation.   Finding no ambiguity in the parties' representation of the stipulation before the district court, we affirm the district court's judgment invalidating the claims of both patents in suit.Notwithstanding its position regarding the stipulation as it relates to the validity of claims not tried before the district court, Scanner charges that the district court failed to separately consider whether the CyberSTEREO performed “the triangulation method” disclosed in claims 24, 29, and 30 of the ′756 patent and various asserted claims of the ′757 patent.   Even if the stipulation was not intended to be what it plainly represents-a representative claim on which the case rises or falls-the district court could not have erred in failing to consider infringement of Scanner's other claims in ruling those claims not infringed because Scanner failed to adduce facts to support a finding that ICOS infringed claims 24, 29, and 30 of the ′756 patent.   Accordingly, we affirm the district court's judgment of noninfringement.VFor the reasons discussed above, we reverse the district court on its inequitable conduct finding, and its judgment that the related, unasserted patents are unenforceable.   Consequently, we vacate the attorneys' fee award.   We affirm the district court's judgment that claim 1 is invalid as it would have been obvious.   We also affirm the district court's judgment invalidating all claims of the patents in suit given the stipulation between the parties that the case would be tried on a representative claim.   We also affirm the district court's holding that the CyberSTEREO does not infringe any claim of the patents in suit generally, and the ′756 patent specifically.COSTSEach party shall bear its own costs for this appeal.AFFIRMED IN PART, REVERSED IN PART, AND VACATED IN PART.FOOTNOTES1.   Petitions to make special are governed by Section 708.02 of the Manual of Patent Examining Procedure (MPEP), which provides that an application may be made special because of actual, but not prospective, infringement upon payment of the fee and the filing of a petition accompanied by a statement by the applicant, assignee, or an attorney/agent alleging the following:(A) That there is an infringing device or product actually on the market or method in use;(B) That a rigid comparison of the alleged infringing device, product, or method with the claims of the application has been made, and that, in his or her opinion, some of the claims are unquestionably infringed;  and(C) That he or she has made or caused to be made a careful and thorough search of the prior art or has a good knowledge of the pertinent prior art.Manual of Patent Examining Procedure § 708.02 (8th ed.2006).2.   As the district court observed, Beaty's statement alleged that:  the UV+ was on “open display” at the December 1998 trade show;  DeProft approached Beaty for a two-hour private meeting;  DeProft had previously inspected the UV+ at the July 1998 trade show in California;  DeProft “took copious notes, diagrams, and drawings” of the UV+ at the Japan trade show;  other ICOS personnel “also rigorously studied the [Scanner] display” at the Japan trade show;  according to a former ICOS employee, after the July 1998 trade show it was suggested at an ICOS meeting that a third party buy the UV+ so that ICOS could see how it worked;  ICOS contacted Scanner in December 1998 about obtaining rights to the UV+;  and on January 26, 1999, ICOS announced the introduction of its CyberSTEREO system, which Beaty described as being “substantially identical” to the UV+.3.   We note that not all false statements or misrepresentations contained in a petition to make special are necessarily material even if the applicant succeeded in receiving expedited treatment for his or her application.   Rather, in evaluating whether a false statement or misrepresentation in a petition to make special is material, a court must determine whether the false statement was likely a but-for cause of the grant of the petition.   If not, a threshold level of materiality has not been established.4.   Of course, a district court need not make explicit findings as to the range of reasonable inferences in every case, but must do so only where it draws an inference from a statement that is also subject to an equally plausible contrary inference.5.   See, e.g., Merriam-Webster's Online Dictionary (defining “rigid” as 1a:  deficient in or devoid of flexibility  >;  b:  appearing stiff and unyielding ;  2 a:  inflexibly set in opinion;  b:  strictly observed < adheres to a rigid schedule>;  3:  firmly inflexible rather than lax or indulgent >;  4:  precise and accurate in procedure ;  5 of an airship:  having the outer shape maintained by a fixed framework).6.   An email sent shortly after the show from one ICOS employee to other ICOS employees, including DeProft, who did attend that show, stated that “[at] SemiCon West we all noticed a potential 3D BGA competitor, Scanner Technologies.”   This statement by an ICOS employee attributes to DeProft, as well as other ICOS employees, at least some awareness of Scanner's presence at the trade show.7.   Scanner contends that the district court erred by declaring unenforceable numerous patents not in suit since it lacked jurisdiction and an evidentiary record to support such a ruling.   Because we hold that the district court erred in holding the patents in suit unenforceable for inequitable conduct, we necessarily vacate the district court's judgment that the related patents not in suit are unenforceable.CLEVENGER, Senior Circuit Judge.



















FindLaw Career Center





Attorney
Corporate Counsel
Academic
Judicial Clerk
Summer Associate
Intern
Law Librarian
Paralegal
Legal Secretary
Law Enforcement
District Attorney
Legal Investigator
Compliance Officer
Investment Banker
Business Development



                Post a Job  |  View More Jobs 



View More

































Research the law
Manage your practice
Manage your career
News and commentary
Get Legal Forms
About us
Find Us On



Cases & Codes / Opinion Summaries / Sample Business Contracts / Research An Attorney or Law Firm
Law Technology / Law Practice Management / Law Firm Marketing Services / Corporate Counsel Center
Legal Career Job Search / Online CLE / Law Student Resources
Law Commentary / Featured Documents / Newsletters / Blogs / RSS Feeds
Legal Forms for Your Practice
Company History / Media Relations / Contact Us / Privacy / Advertising / Jobs







Copyright © Fri Jul 28 08:19:31 PDT 2017 FindLaw, a Thomson Reuters business. All rights reserved.









Scanner Technologies Corp | Minneapolis, MN - Macrae's Blue Book






















America's Original Industrial Directory Since 1893 

Login











Home
News



Advertise With Us

Ultimate Marketing Bundle
Industrial B2B Search Engine Rankings
Industrial Directory Advertising




Get Listed
Why Us?
About Us







Company / 
						Product/Service




 

Search













Is This Your Company?

Scanner Technologies Corp



Address:

14505 21st Ave N Ste 220
Minneapolis,  MN
,  55447-5602





Phone:
763-476-8271
Fax:
763-476-0364
Website:


								www.scannertech....
							


Contact this Company


This company is located in the Central Time Zone and the office is currently
								
									Open


Get a Free Quote from Scanner Technologies Corp and other companies


Click here and Select a Product...INSTRUMENTS: Testing, Semiconductor






Scanner Technologies Corp Products:
Manufactures semiconductor test equipment Measuring and observing and testing instruments, Weight measuring instruments, Length and thickness and distance measuring instruments, Viewing and observing instruments and accessories




Estimated Shipping Rates from 	Minneapolis, Minnesota to

(Select State Below)
Alabama (AL) Alaska (AK) Arizona (AZ) Arkansas (AR) California (CA) Colorado (CO) Connecticut (CT) Delaware (DE) Florida (FL) Georgia (GA) Hawaii (HI) Idaho (ID) Illinois (IL) Indiana (IN) Iowa (IA) Kansas (KS) Kentucky (KY) Louisiana (LA) Maine (ME) Maryland (MD) Massachusetts (MA) Michigan (MI) Minnesota (MN) Mississippi (MS) Missouri (MO) Montana (MT) Nebraska (NE) Nevada (NV) New Hampshire (NH) New Jersey (NJ) New Mexico (NM) New York (NY) North Carolina (NC) North Dakota (ND) Ohio (OH) Oklahoma (OK) Oregon (OR) Pennsylvania (PA) Rhode Island (RI) South Carolina (SC) South Dakota (SD) Tennessee (TN) Texas (TX) Utah (UT) Vermont (VT) Virginia (VA) Washington (WA) West Virginia (WV) Wisconsin (WI) Wyoming (WY)


			These costs are an estimate and cannot be used as actual shipping costs. Please contact Scanner Technologies Corp for a complete quote with shipping costs.
			




Shipment Type
Estimated Price





Get a Free Quote from Scanner Technologies Corp and other companies


Click here and Select a Product...INSTRUMENTS: Testing, Semiconductor









Additional Info for Scanner Technologies Corp



							Products - National
 

							Products - Local
 



Products offered by Scanner Technologies Corp


INSTRUMENTS: Testing, Semiconductor



Products offered in Minnesota


					INSTRUMENTS: Testing, Semiconductor - serving Minnesota 



  








Show All


Related Companies
					
					within
					
10 mi 20 mi 50 mi 100 mi 200 mi 500 mi


Relating Score



B

Micro Component Tech Inc
13mi
2340 County Road C W # 100, Saint Paul
								

10


C

Aetrium Inc
23mi
2350 Helen St N, Saint Paul
								

10


D

Celadon Systems Inc
23mi
14763 Energy Way, Apple Valley
								

10












Services
About MacRAE's
Quick links
Local Search Partners
Industrial Partners


Advertise With Us
Get Listed
Contact MacRAE'S BLUE BOOK

About Us
FAQ's
Partners
News
Testimonials


Link To Us
Data Products
Terms and Conditions
Site Map


Profile Canada


Canadian Trade Index 


 

Browse by Company:  
		A-B 
		C-E 
		F-J 
		K-O 
		P-S 
		T-Z 
		
		                 
		Browse by Heading:  
		A-C  
		D-K  
		L-R  
		S-Z




			© 2017 MacRAE'S. All rights reserved
			
Like us -


|
Join us -


|
Follow us -
















 


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









Scanner Technologies Corporation: OTCMKTS:SCNI quotes & news - Google FinanceCookies help us deliver our services. By using our services, you agree to our use of cookiesLearn moreGot itMy AccountSearchMapsYouTubePlayNewsGmailDriveCalendarGoogle+TranslatePhotosMoreShoppingWalletFinanceDocsBooksBloggerContactsHangoutsKeepEven more from GoogleSign inHidden fieldsSearch FinanceAdobe Flash Player is required for interactive charts. AllowFinanceScanner Technologies Corporation(OTCMKTS:SCNI)Add to portfolioCompanySummaryNewsRelated companiesHistorical pricesFinancialsMarketsNewsPortfoliosStock screenerGoogle Domestic TrendsRecent Quotes (30 days)You have no recent quoteschg | %




Scanner Technologies Corporation  (Public, OTCMKTS:SCNI)  
Watch this stock
 




















0.00190









Delayed:
 

2:44PM EDT



OTCMKTS
data delayed by 15 mins -
Disclaimer

Currency in USD







Range

    -



52 week

    -



Open

    -



Vol / Avg.

0.00/0.00



Mkt cap

15,089.00



P/E

    -



Div/yield

    -



EPS

-0.13



Shares

12.24M



Beta

    -



Inst. own

6%































News





Relevance



Date











All news for Scanner Technologies Corporation »

Subscribe






Advertisement


Key stats and ratios




Q3 (Sep '08)
2007


Net profit margin
11000.00%
-424.29%

Operating margin
11342.86%
-408.34%

EBITD margin
-
-158.52%

Return on average assets
4697.28%
-450.49%

Return on average equity
-
-

Employees
9
-

CDP Score
-

-



More ratios from Thomson Reuters »

Address
4665 S Ash Ave Ste G-20TEMPE, AZ 85282-6766United States
- Map+1-480-7773793 (Phone)

Website links


http://www.scannertech.com/

















Settings |
Technicals |



Link to this view





Sources include SIX.




















Advertisement







Related companies





Show:


Most Recent Quarter


Most Recent Annual




Add or remove columns
Save changes
Cancel









More from FactSet »










Description




Scannertech LLC, is a 3D coplanarity inspection technology company. The Company provides inspection solutions for the semiconductor industry. The Company’s UltraVim inspection modules can perform 3D lead inspection and 3D BGA inspection on semiconductor packages. The Company also offers products for mark inspection, alignment and also provides custom solutions to meet specific customer requirements. The Company’s product line includes: UX-48MM - 3D Coplanarity Inspection Module, UX-46MM – 3D Coplanarity Inspection Module, VX-46MM - 3D Coplanarity Inspection Module, 4D-35MM - 3D Coplanarity Inspection Module, 2D-30MM - 2D Lead Inspection System, and 2M-30MM - 2D Mark Inspection System. The Company also provides support, software, repairs and upgrades for the UltraVim component inspection products.


More from Reuters »












Google Finance Beta available in: Hong Kong - Canada - U.S. - China - U.K.Information is provided "as is" and solely for informational purposes, not for trading purposes or advice, and may be delayed.To see all exchange delays, please  see disclaimer.©2017 Google - Google Home - Blog - Help - Report a Problem - Privacy Policy - Terms of Service



















US Court Cases: Find US Opinions at FindLaw

























Not a Legal Professional?  Visit our consumer site

Register | Login
Welcome.Edit Your Profile | Log Out
Javascript is disabled. Please enable Javascript to log in.







Search




Cases & Codes
Practice Management
Jobs & Careers
Newsletters
Blogs
Law Technology




Forms
Lawyer Marketing
Corporate Counsel
Law Students
JusticeMail
Reference





















FindLaw
Caselaw
United States



Browse United States Courts

District of Columbia Court of Appeals.
Judicial Conference of the United States Committee on Judicial Conduct and Disability.
Judicial Council of the District of Columbia Circuit.
Judicial Council of the Eighth Circuit.
Judicial Council of the Ninth Circuit.
Judicial Council of the Second Circuit.
Judicial Council of the Seventh Circuit.
Judicial Council of the Tenth Circuit.
United States Bankruptcy Appellate Panel
United States DC Circuit
United States Eighth Circuit
United States Eleventh Circuit
United States Federal Circuit
United States Fifth Circuit
United States First Circuit
United States Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Court
United States Fourth Circuit
United States Judicial Conference Committee
United States Ninth Circuit
United States Second Circuit
United States Seventh Circuit
United States Sixth Circuit
United States Supreme Court
United States Tenth Circuit
United States Third Circuit


















FindLaw Career Center





Attorney
Corporate Counsel
Academic
Judicial Clerk
Summer Associate
Intern
Law Librarian
Paralegal
Legal Secretary
Law Enforcement
District Attorney
Legal Investigator
Compliance Officer
Investment Banker
Business Development



                Post a Job  |  View More Jobs 



View More

































Research the law
Manage your practice
Manage your career
News and commentary
Get Legal Forms
About us
Find Us On



Cases & Codes / Opinion Summaries / Sample Business Contracts / Research An Attorney or Law Firm
Law Technology / Law Practice Management / Law Firm Marketing Services / Corporate Counsel Center
Legal Career Job Search / Online CLE / Law Student Resources
Law Commentary / Featured Documents / Newsletters / Blogs / RSS Feeds
Legal Forms for Your Practice
Company History / Media Relations / Contact Us / Privacy / Advertising / Jobs







Copyright © Fri Jul 28 08:19:32 PDT 2017 FindLaw, a Thomson Reuters business. All rights reserved.








Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Scanner Technologies Corp 125 SE Main St Minneapolis, MN Electronic Equipment & Supplies-Mfrs - MapQuest







































































































    Scanner Technologies Corp
  

125 SE Main St

Minneapolis
MN
55414




 Reviews



(763) 476-8271
Website

        Menu & Reservations
      



            Make Reservations 




            Order Online
          

            Tickets
          




          Tickets
        


        See Availability
      





      Nearby
    


      Directions
    


    {{::location.tagLine.value.text}}
  



Sponsored Topics








































See a problem?
Let us know!






















Legal






Help





















﻿







Services and Support | Microscan



































Microscan introduces new Professional Services offerings, enabling customers access to advanced product support options.







Products





Laser Barcode Scanners


2D Barcode Readers


Handheld Barcode Readers


Barcode Verification 


Print Quality Inspection Systems


Machine Vision Systems


Engineered Solutions


Barcode Software and Connectivity


NERLITE Machine Vision Lighting


Auto ID Accessories


Machine Vision Accessories


Legacy Products




Industries





Packaging & Labeling


Electronics Manufacturing


Life Sciences & Medical


Factory Automation




Resources





Case Studies


White Papers


Videos


Webinars


Know Your Tech


Products & Applications




Support





Services


Download Center


Tech Support Self-Help


Product Warranty


Terms and Conditions


Quality & Environmental Management System


Helpdesk Request




Blog


Make Barcodes


Company





Office Locations


How To Buy


Supplier Information


Terms and Conditions


Company News


Legacy of Innovation


Events


Recognition


Contact Us


Careers


Integrator Alliance


Prospective Partners


Parent Company


Photo Galleries


Product Catalog


Privacy Policy









                        中国
                        




                        English
                        




                        Français
                        




                        Deutsch
                        




                        Español
                        













Support









            Support
        



Services



Download Center



Tech Support Self-Help



Product Warranty



Terms and Conditions



Quality & Environmental Management System



Helpdesk Request










Microscan Service and Support
Microscan places high priority on customer support. Our self-help resources are designed to enable our partners' successful understanding, sales, installation, and support of Microscan products.
Self-Help Technical Support




Quick-Find Technical Instruction  Custom Google keyword search through all Microscan User's Manuals, Configuration Sheets, and all product documentation.



Search Helpdesk Questions and Answers  Technical Support Self-Help by searching our archives of posted Helpdesk technical questions and answers.



Download Center View and download all product documents and software, including: Product Specification Sheets, User's Manuals, ESP Software, Connectivity Sheets, etc.




Do you have a technical product question for our Helpdesk?
Submit a Helpdesk Request  With a detailed description of your issue, we can provide the best possible technical support.  






















TEMPEST Scanners | API Technologies




































 
Skip to Navigation



 




07.28.2017
BLOG






 
 













 
 
 



TEMPEST Scanners
 



TEMPEST SS8270TI Flatbed Scanner


The SS8270TI is the latest development in TEMPEST flatbed scanners to AMSG788A from SST. It is based on the world's first flatbed scanner series to offer 4800 dpi resolution providing crystal clear results with rich, bright and accurate colors. The SS8270TI is designed for users wanting a high performance scanner capable of capturing images of the highest quality, from all types of original, as quickly as possible.
It’s also versatile – the integrated TMA is used for scanning 35 mm slides and negatives and accepts strips of up to three transparencies or negatives at once. The SS8270TI combines a dual resolution CCD (4800/600 dpi), plus fast grayscale for optimum combination of speed and image quality. The CCD technology enables scanning from 3D objects such as products or other reference materials.

Features: 



4800 dpi TWAIN scanner
Dual resolution CCD (4800/600 dpi) 
Instant on - "no warm up" scanning 
Scan from 3D objects 
Fast preview - 4 seconds 
10 - 2000% scaling 
ReadIRIS Pro, Optical Character Recognition
 



Benefits: 


 

“No Warm-Up” scanning makes the SS8270TI efficient and easy to use
With its versatility, the SS8270TI fits the needs of any user in any setting
Various scanning options allows users to complete tasks in a much more efficient way
 



 


TEMPEST SS8270TF Flatbed Scanner


The SS8270TF is a high performance TEMPEST digital Flatbed Scanner for professional applications including high resolution photo/transparency scanning and document management. Based on the world's first flatbed scanner series to offer 4800 dpi resolution for crystal clear results with rich, bright and accurate colors, the SS8270TF can present a preview of a page in four seconds and scan up to 25 pages per minute with the Automatic Document Feeder.
The SS8270TF TEMPEST SDIP 27 Level A digital Flatbed Scanner is based on the HP 8270 and is designed for users wanting a high performance scanner capable of quickly capturing images of the highest quality from all types of original.

Features: 



4800 dpi TWAIN scanner
Dual resolution CCD (4800/600 dpi) 
Instant on - "no warm up" scanning 
Scan from 3D objects 
Fast preview - 4 seconds 
10 - 2000% scaling 
ReadIRIS Pro, Optical Character Recognition
 



Benefits: 



The TEMPEST scanner’s high resolution ensures the best possible outcome every time
Dual resolution CCD makes it possible to scan 3D objects, increasing scanning capabilities
After meeting various requirements, the TEMPEST SS8270TF Scanner is guaranteed to provide the highest level of security and reliability
 



 


TEMPEST SS100TF Mobile Personal Scanner


The SS100TF is the latest in the range of TEMPEST scanners from API Technologies. Based on the Visioneer RoadWarriorTM, this scanner is compact enough to fit neatly on your desk and pack easily alongside your laptop or in your briefcase. Designed to be fully mobile whilst still meeting SDIP 27 Level A (AMSG720B) TEMPEST Standards the SS100TF conforms to the user's needs.
The SS100TF is powerful enough to scan and organize all of your documents, photos, articles, brochures and business cards. The SS100TF TEMPEST Scanner will also provide thumbnails for popular electronic files with built-in viewers for PDF, Word and Excel.
The SS100TF is tightly integrated with ScanSoft PaperPort Deluxe making it easy to organize your life and work. Now you can scan and file all of your documents and photographs electronically right alongside your electronic documents from Microsoft Office, PDF files from Adobe Acrobat and image files from numerous other applications

Features: 



Weighs only 2lbs
Scanner Bit Depth (color) 36-bit internal 
USB Interface 
Self Powered from USB Port 
Optical Resolution - 600 dpi
 



Benefits: 



The TEMPEST SS100TF scanner not only fulfills government requirements, ensuring the highest level of security, but comes in a compact size, eliminating clutter from your work area
Designed to be fully mobile, the TEMPEST scanner enables users perform necessary tasks from any location
The SS100TF is designed to scan and systematize all documents, making this a simple and cost effective solution to organizational problems 
 



 


TEMPEST High Volume Scanner


Emcon's TEMPEST high speed scanners are highly customized to meet TEMPEST Level I, II, and III requirements.

 


TEMPEST Level I Scanner


Based on the Fujitsu™ fi-5530C2 High Speed Color Duplex Scanner, API Technologies Corp has developed the TEMPEST Level I Scanner.  This product meets the requirements of: NSTISSAM TEMPEST/1-92, Level I; CID09/15A, Level I; and SDIP-27 Level A (providing the equipment and associated systems are installed to the requirements identified in SDIP-29).  The TEMPEST Level I Scanner not only adheres to government standards but utilizes the best technology in order to provide clear scans and crisp images.

Features: 



100 page automatic document feeder
Ultrasonic multi-feed detection 
Auto color detection, blank page deletion, auto cropping, auto de-skew
 



Benefits: 



An optional post-scanning imprinter is offered, which prints numbers, letters and codes on original document after they have been scanned.
Various automatic features eliminate the hassle of attempting to correct errors manually
High count document feeder offers a more efficient mode of scanning
 



 


TEMPEST Version HP ScanJet™ 8270 Scanner


API Technologies Corp. has developed a TEMPEST version of HP's ScanJet 8270 scanner for government users requiring full TEMPEST computing environments - TEMPEST Level 1 (AMSG 720B). This scanner features up to 4800 dpi optical resolution and 48-bit color. The 8270 performs document scanning at up to 25 ppm and for unattended scans, up to 50 pages can be loaded in the automatic document feeder. By leveraging state-of-the-art mechanical and electronic design tools, API Technologies Corp. develops and maintains products that provide the best service possible.

Features: 



Software Included
Compatible Operating Systems and System Requirements
Automatic Document Feeder
 



Benefits: 



After meeting various requirements, the TEMPEST Version HP ScanJet™ 8270 Scanner is guaranteed to provide the highest level of security and reliability
In as little as 28 sec, 4 x 6-inch photo to Microsoft Word; in as little as 47 sec, OCR; in as little as 32 sec, 4 x 6-inch photo to email, making the ScanJet™ 8270 the most efficient product available
Hi-resolution scanning ensures the best outcome every time the TEMPEST Version HP ScanJet™ 8270 Scanner is used
 



 


 





Company

About API
Management
Awards
Certifications


Products

Product Finder
RF & Microwave Solutions
Microelectronics
Electromagnetic Integrated Solutions
Power Solutions
Secure Systems & Information Assurance
Electronics Manufacturing Services
Space Products
Inmet Brand Products
Weinschel Brand Products
Engineered Solutions
Shop by Brand


Media Room

Press Releases
In the News
Highlighted Videos
Trade Shows & Events


Contact

Contact Us
Request a Quote
Distributor Network
Locations


Careers

Career Opportunities


Resources

Resources and Documentation
Sales Literature
Sales Presentations
Supplier Portal
Terms and Conditions
Supplier Quality Requirements
Controlled and Prohibited Materials
Corrective Action Plan
Stock Check
Conflict Minerals Policy
2014 Form SD Conflict Minerals Report
Conflict Minerals Template




 
 
 
 








Contact API Technologies

API Technologies Corp.
400 Nickerson Road
Marlborough, MA 01752
P: +1 855-294-3800

Visit our other API Technologies sites

RF/Microwave & Microelectronics
Electromagnetic Integrated Solutions
Power Solutions
Secure Systems & Information Assurance
Electronics Manufacturing Services





Get in touch

Contact Us ›
Request a Quote ›
Consult an Engineer ›
Contact the Web Administrator ›

Learn more

About Us ›
Products ›
Locations ›
Product Divisions ›
Press Releases ›
Awards ›
Featured Videos ›





Resources

Career Opportunities ›
Find Sales Reps ›
Distributor Network ›
Partners Login ›
Supplier Portal ›
Stock Check ›
Quality Certifications ›
Regulatory Materials ›
User Gateway ›

Tools & Services

Product Finder ›
Site Search ›





Follow Us

Follow us on Twitter ›
Join us on LinkedIn ›
Like us on Facebook ›
Our Google+ Community ›
Blog ›

Events

Trade Shows & Events ›







© 2017 API Technologies Corp All Rights Reserved.  |  Disclaimer  |  Privacy Policy  |  Terms & Conditions












 
 
 



﻿







Services and Support | Microscan



































Microscan introduces new Professional Services offerings, enabling customers access to advanced product support options.







Products





Laser Barcode Scanners


2D Barcode Readers


Handheld Barcode Readers


Barcode Verification 


Print Quality Inspection Systems


Machine Vision Systems


Engineered Solutions


Barcode Software and Connectivity


NERLITE Machine Vision Lighting


Auto ID Accessories


Machine Vision Accessories


Legacy Products




Industries





Packaging & Labeling


Electronics Manufacturing


Life Sciences & Medical


Factory Automation




Resources





Case Studies


White Papers


Videos


Webinars


Know Your Tech


Products & Applications




Support





Services


Download Center


Tech Support Self-Help


Product Warranty


Terms and Conditions


Quality & Environmental Management System


Helpdesk Request




Blog


Make Barcodes


Company





Office Locations


How To Buy


Supplier Information


Terms and Conditions


Company News


Legacy of Innovation


Events


Recognition


Contact Us


Careers


Integrator Alliance


Prospective Partners


Parent Company


Photo Galleries


Product Catalog


Privacy Policy









                        中国
                        




                        English
                        




                        Français
                        




                        Deutsch
                        




                        Español
                        













Support









            Support
        



Services



Download Center



Tech Support Self-Help



Product Warranty



Terms and Conditions



Quality & Environmental Management System



Helpdesk Request










Microscan Service and Support
Microscan places high priority on customer support. Our self-help resources are designed to enable our partners' successful understanding, sales, installation, and support of Microscan products.
Self-Help Technical Support




Quick-Find Technical Instruction  Custom Google keyword search through all Microscan User's Manuals, Configuration Sheets, and all product documentation.



Search Helpdesk Questions and Answers  Technical Support Self-Help by searching our archives of posted Helpdesk technical questions and answers.



Download Center View and download all product documents and software, including: Product Specification Sheets, User's Manuals, ESP Software, Connectivity Sheets, etc.




Do you have a technical product question for our Helpdesk?
Submit a Helpdesk Request  With a detailed description of your issue, we can provide the best possible technical support.  



















﻿







Precision Products to Enable Track, Trace, and Control | Microscan



































Microscan introduces new Professional Services offerings, enabling customers access to advanced product support options.







Products





Laser Barcode Scanners


2D Barcode Readers


Handheld Barcode Readers


Barcode Verification 


Print Quality Inspection Systems


Machine Vision Systems


Engineered Solutions


Barcode Software and Connectivity


NERLITE Machine Vision Lighting


Auto ID Accessories


Machine Vision Accessories


Legacy Products




Industries





Packaging & Labeling


Electronics Manufacturing


Life Sciences & Medical


Factory Automation




Resources





Case Studies


White Papers


Videos


Webinars


Know Your Tech


Products & Applications




Support





Services


Download Center


Tech Support Self-Help


Product Warranty


Terms and Conditions


Quality & Environmental Management System


Helpdesk Request




Blog


Make Barcodes


Company





Office Locations


How To Buy


Supplier Information


Terms and Conditions


Company News


Legacy of Innovation


Events


Recognition


Contact Us


Careers


Integrator Alliance


Prospective Partners


Parent Company


Photo Galleries


Product Catalog


Privacy Policy









                        中国
                        




                        English
                        




                        Français
                        




                        Deutsch
                        




                        Español
                        













Products









            Product List
        



Product Overview



Meet MicroHAWK



Laser Barcode Scanners


MS-1 Scan Engine


MS-2 Ultra-Compact CCD Reader


MS-3 Compact Laser Barcode Scanner


QX-830 Industrial Barcode Scanner


QX-870 Industrial Raster Laser Scanner


MS-890 Industrial Automation Scanner





2D Barcode Readers


MicroHAWK Barcode Readers


MicroHAWK Engine


MS-2D Engine


MINI Hawk Imager


QX Hawk Flexible Industrial Imager





Handheld Barcode Readers


HS-21 Handheld Barcode Reader


HS-41X Handheld DPM Reader


HS-51X Wireless DPM Reader


Mobile Hawk Direct Part Marking Handheld Imager





Barcode Verification 


LVS-9510 Desktop Barcode Verifier


LVS-9570 Wide Area Barcode Verifier


LVS-9580 Handheld Barcode Verifier


VMI Software


Barcode Verification Kits





Print Quality Inspection Systems


LVS-7000 Print Quality Inspection System


LVS-7300 Print Quality Inspection System


LVS-7500 Print Quality Inspection System


LVS-7510 Print Quality Inspection System





Machine Vision Systems


MicroHAWK Smart Cameras


MicroHAWK Engine


AutoVISION Machine Vision Software


Vision MINI Smart Camera


Vision HAWK Smart Camera


Visionscape Machine Vision Software


Visionscape GigE Integrated Vision Solution





Engineered Solutions


PanelScan PCB Traceability System


I-PAK Multi-Camera Inspection System





Barcode Software and Connectivity


WebLink


ESP Easy Setup Program


MS-Connect 210 Connectivity Solution with Ethernet




NERLITE Machine Vision Lighting


Auto ID Accessories


Machine Vision Accessories


Legacy Products









Product Overview

Microscan helps manufacturers drive down cost, automate critical manufacturing processes, and increase yields through data acquisition and control solutions. Product technology ranges from basic barcode reading through complex machine vision.Not sure which product you need? We’re happy to help you, just let us know.






            Barcode Reading / Automatic Identification
        





            Barcode Reading / Automatic Identification
        

Versatile decoding power within the world’s smallest industrial barcode readers. With the highest-performance imaging engine in its class, MicroHAWK® readers offer modular hardware options to take on any decoding task.


VIEW BARCODE READERS
View 2D Readers
View Handhelds









            Barcode Verification
        





            Barcode Verification
        

Extensive range of in-line and off-line LVS® verifiers designed for the verification of linear barcodes and 2D symbols to ISO/IEC quality standards.


View Barcode Verification Solutions 









            Machine Vision Systems
        





            Machine Vision Systems
        

Technology-leading machine vision hardware and software for virtually any machine vision application. Features the scalability to accomplish simple to advanced machine vision in one powerful package.


View Machine Vision Solutions
View Engineered Solutions












Laser Barcode Scanners





MS-1 Scan Engine





MS-2 Ultra-Compact CCD Reader





MS-3 Compact Laser Barcode Scanner





QX-830 Industrial Barcode Scanner





QX-870 Industrial Raster Laser Scanner





MS-890 Industrial Automation Scanner






2D Barcode Readers





MicroHAWK Barcode Readers





MicroHAWK Engine





MS-2D Engine





MINI Hawk Imager





QX Hawk Flexible Industrial Imager






Handheld Barcode Readers





HS-21 Handheld Barcode Reader





HS-41X Handheld DPM Reader





HS-51X Wireless DPM Reader





Mobile Hawk Direct Part Marking Handheld Imager






Barcode Verification 





LVS-9510 Desktop Barcode Verifier





LVS-9570 Wide Area Barcode Verifier





LVS-9580 Handheld Barcode Verifier





VMI Software





Barcode Verification Kits






Print Quality Inspection Systems





LVS-7000 Print Quality Inspection System





LVS-7300 Print Quality Inspection System





LVS-7500 Print Quality Inspection System





LVS-7510 Print Quality Inspection System






Machine Vision Systems





MicroHAWK Smart Cameras





MicroHAWK Engine





AutoVISION Machine Vision Software





Vision MINI Smart Camera





Vision HAWK Smart Camera





Visionscape Machine Vision Software





Visionscape GigE Integrated Vision Solution






Engineered Solutions





PanelScan PCB Traceability System





I-PAK Multi-Camera Inspection System






Barcode Software and Connectivity





WebLink





ESP Easy Setup Program





MS-Connect 210 Connectivity Solution with Ethernet





















﻿







Industries and Applications | Data Control and Process Automation for Electronics, Life Sciences, Pharmaceutical and Automotive



































Microscan introduces new Professional Services offerings, enabling customers access to advanced product support options.







Products





Laser Barcode Scanners


2D Barcode Readers


Handheld Barcode Readers


Barcode Verification 


Print Quality Inspection Systems


Machine Vision Systems


Engineered Solutions


Barcode Software and Connectivity


NERLITE Machine Vision Lighting


Auto ID Accessories


Machine Vision Accessories


Legacy Products




Industries





Packaging & Labeling


Electronics Manufacturing


Life Sciences & Medical


Factory Automation




Resources





Case Studies


White Papers


Videos


Webinars


Know Your Tech


Products & Applications




Support





Services


Download Center


Tech Support Self-Help


Product Warranty


Terms and Conditions


Quality & Environmental Management System


Helpdesk Request




Blog


Make Barcodes


Company





Office Locations


How To Buy


Supplier Information


Terms and Conditions


Company News


Legacy of Innovation


Events


Recognition


Contact Us


Careers


Integrator Alliance


Prospective Partners


Parent Company


Photo Galleries


Product Catalog


Privacy Policy









                        中国
                        




                        English
                        




                        Français
                        




                        Deutsch
                        




                        Español
                        













Industries







Automation Solutions That Fit Your Business
Data is the foundation of today’s modern facilities. Barcode reading, machine vision and verification components equip industrial professionals with the most reliable and efficient means of acquiring data through barcodes, text and visual elements. Microscan products feature the leading technology in traceability, quality control and analytics to safeguard the integrity of data and empower manufacturers to improve their processes by clarifying data patterns and discrepancies. It is our vision to enable faster, more accessible and broader data communications in a wide range of applications like yours – so you can do business better.







Packaging & Labeling

Printing & Labeling
Medical Devices
Pharmaceuticals & Cosmetics
Fast-Moving Consumer Goods (FMCG)
Food & Beverage
Packaging Machinery (OEMs)





Electronics Manufacturing

Automotive Electronics
Consumer Electronics
Aerospace & Defense
Medical Device Manufacturing
Semiconductor
Machine Builder
SMT Line Equipment Supplier
Test Equipment Supplier







Life Sciences & Medical

Laboratory Automation
Clinical Chemistry
Molecular Diagnostics
Tissue Diagnostics
Immunochemistry
Hematology
Point of Care
Reagent & Kit Identification and Tracking





Factory Automation

Automotive Assembly
Power Train
Aerospace & Defense
Industrial Manufacturing
White Goods
Robotics
Machine Building






 

 

















﻿







Industries and Applications | Data Control and Process Automation for Electronics, Life Sciences, Pharmaceutical and Automotive



































Microscan introduces new Professional Services offerings, enabling customers access to advanced product support options.







Products





Laser Barcode Scanners


2D Barcode Readers


Handheld Barcode Readers


Barcode Verification 


Print Quality Inspection Systems


Machine Vision Systems


Engineered Solutions


Barcode Software and Connectivity


NERLITE Machine Vision Lighting


Auto ID Accessories


Machine Vision Accessories


Legacy Products




Industries





Packaging & Labeling


Electronics Manufacturing


Life Sciences & Medical


Factory Automation




Resources





Case Studies


White Papers


Videos


Webinars


Know Your Tech


Products & Applications




Support





Services


Download Center


Tech Support Self-Help


Product Warranty


Terms and Conditions


Quality & Environmental Management System


Helpdesk Request




Blog


Make Barcodes


Company





Office Locations


How To Buy


Supplier Information


Terms and Conditions


Company News


Legacy of Innovation


Events


Recognition


Contact Us


Careers


Integrator Alliance


Prospective Partners


Parent Company


Photo Galleries


Product Catalog


Privacy Policy









                        中国
                        




                        English
                        




                        Français
                        




                        Deutsch
                        




                        Español
                        













Industries







Automation Solutions That Fit Your Business
Data is the foundation of today’s modern facilities. Barcode reading, machine vision and verification components equip industrial professionals with the most reliable and efficient means of acquiring data through barcodes, text and visual elements. Microscan products feature the leading technology in traceability, quality control and analytics to safeguard the integrity of data and empower manufacturers to improve their processes by clarifying data patterns and discrepancies. It is our vision to enable faster, more accessible and broader data communications in a wide range of applications like yours – so you can do business better.







Packaging & Labeling

Printing & Labeling
Medical Devices
Pharmaceuticals & Cosmetics
Fast-Moving Consumer Goods (FMCG)
Food & Beverage
Packaging Machinery (OEMs)





Electronics Manufacturing

Automotive Electronics
Consumer Electronics
Aerospace & Defense
Medical Device Manufacturing
Semiconductor
Machine Builder
SMT Line Equipment Supplier
Test Equipment Supplier







Life Sciences & Medical

Laboratory Automation
Clinical Chemistry
Molecular Diagnostics
Tissue Diagnostics
Immunochemistry
Hematology
Point of Care
Reagent & Kit Identification and Tracking





Factory Automation

Automotive Assembly
Power Train
Aerospace & Defense
Industrial Manufacturing
White Goods
Robotics
Machine Building






 

 

















﻿







Precision Products to Enable Track, Trace, and Control | Microscan



































Microscan introduces new Professional Services offerings, enabling customers access to advanced product support options.







Products





Laser Barcode Scanners


2D Barcode Readers


Handheld Barcode Readers


Barcode Verification 


Print Quality Inspection Systems


Machine Vision Systems


Engineered Solutions


Barcode Software and Connectivity


NERLITE Machine Vision Lighting


Auto ID Accessories


Machine Vision Accessories


Legacy Products




Industries





Packaging & Labeling


Electronics Manufacturing


Life Sciences & Medical


Factory Automation




Resources





Case Studies


White Papers


Videos


Webinars


Know Your Tech


Products & Applications




Support





Services


Download Center


Tech Support Self-Help


Product Warranty


Terms and Conditions


Quality & Environmental Management System


Helpdesk Request




Blog


Make Barcodes


Company





Office Locations


How To Buy


Supplier Information


Terms and Conditions


Company News


Legacy of Innovation


Events


Recognition


Contact Us


Careers


Integrator Alliance


Prospective Partners


Parent Company


Photo Galleries


Product Catalog


Privacy Policy









                        中国
                        




                        English
                        




                        Français
                        




                        Deutsch
                        




                        Español
                        













Products









            Product List
        



Product Overview



Meet MicroHAWK



Laser Barcode Scanners


MS-1 Scan Engine


MS-2 Ultra-Compact CCD Reader


MS-3 Compact Laser Barcode Scanner


QX-830 Industrial Barcode Scanner


QX-870 Industrial Raster Laser Scanner


MS-890 Industrial Automation Scanner





2D Barcode Readers


MicroHAWK Barcode Readers


MicroHAWK Engine


MS-2D Engine


MINI Hawk Imager


QX Hawk Flexible Industrial Imager





Handheld Barcode Readers


HS-21 Handheld Barcode Reader


HS-41X Handheld DPM Reader


HS-51X Wireless DPM Reader


Mobile Hawk Direct Part Marking Handheld Imager





Barcode Verification 


LVS-9510 Desktop Barcode Verifier


LVS-9570 Wide Area Barcode Verifier


LVS-9580 Handheld Barcode Verifier


VMI Software


Barcode Verification Kits





Print Quality Inspection Systems


LVS-7000 Print Quality Inspection System


LVS-7300 Print Quality Inspection System


LVS-7500 Print Quality Inspection System


LVS-7510 Print Quality Inspection System





Machine Vision Systems


MicroHAWK Smart Cameras


MicroHAWK Engine


AutoVISION Machine Vision Software


Vision MINI Smart Camera


Vision HAWK Smart Camera


Visionscape Machine Vision Software


Visionscape GigE Integrated Vision Solution





Engineered Solutions


PanelScan PCB Traceability System


I-PAK Multi-Camera Inspection System





Barcode Software and Connectivity


WebLink


ESP Easy Setup Program


MS-Connect 210 Connectivity Solution with Ethernet




NERLITE Machine Vision Lighting


Auto ID Accessories


Machine Vision Accessories


Legacy Products









Product Overview

Microscan helps manufacturers drive down cost, automate critical manufacturing processes, and increase yields through data acquisition and control solutions. Product technology ranges from basic barcode reading through complex machine vision.Not sure which product you need? We’re happy to help you, just let us know.






            Barcode Reading / Automatic Identification
        





            Barcode Reading / Automatic Identification
        

Versatile decoding power within the world’s smallest industrial barcode readers. With the highest-performance imaging engine in its class, MicroHAWK® readers offer modular hardware options to take on any decoding task.


VIEW BARCODE READERS
View 2D Readers
View Handhelds









            Barcode Verification
        





            Barcode Verification
        

Extensive range of in-line and off-line LVS® verifiers designed for the verification of linear barcodes and 2D symbols to ISO/IEC quality standards.


View Barcode Verification Solutions 









            Machine Vision Systems
        





            Machine Vision Systems
        

Technology-leading machine vision hardware and software for virtually any machine vision application. Features the scalability to accomplish simple to advanced machine vision in one powerful package.


View Machine Vision Solutions
View Engineered Solutions












Laser Barcode Scanners





MS-1 Scan Engine





MS-2 Ultra-Compact CCD Reader





MS-3 Compact Laser Barcode Scanner





QX-830 Industrial Barcode Scanner





QX-870 Industrial Raster Laser Scanner





MS-890 Industrial Automation Scanner






2D Barcode Readers





MicroHAWK Barcode Readers





MicroHAWK Engine





MS-2D Engine





MINI Hawk Imager





QX Hawk Flexible Industrial Imager






Handheld Barcode Readers





HS-21 Handheld Barcode Reader





HS-41X Handheld DPM Reader





HS-51X Wireless DPM Reader





Mobile Hawk Direct Part Marking Handheld Imager






Barcode Verification 





LVS-9510 Desktop Barcode Verifier





LVS-9570 Wide Area Barcode Verifier





LVS-9580 Handheld Barcode Verifier





VMI Software





Barcode Verification Kits






Print Quality Inspection Systems





LVS-7000 Print Quality Inspection System





LVS-7300 Print Quality Inspection System





LVS-7500 Print Quality Inspection System





LVS-7510 Print Quality Inspection System






Machine Vision Systems





MicroHAWK Smart Cameras





MicroHAWK Engine





AutoVISION Machine Vision Software





Vision MINI Smart Camera





Vision HAWK Smart Camera





Visionscape Machine Vision Software





Visionscape GigE Integrated Vision Solution






Engineered Solutions





PanelScan PCB Traceability System





I-PAK Multi-Camera Inspection System






Barcode Software and Connectivity





WebLink





ESP Easy Setup Program





MS-Connect 210 Connectivity Solution with Ethernet





















﻿







Barcode Generator



































Microscan introduces new Professional Services offerings, enabling customers access to advanced product support options.







Products





Laser Barcode Scanners


2D Barcode Readers


Handheld Barcode Readers


Barcode Verification 


Print Quality Inspection Systems


Machine Vision Systems


Engineered Solutions


Barcode Software and Connectivity


NERLITE Machine Vision Lighting


Auto ID Accessories


Machine Vision Accessories


Legacy Products




Industries





Packaging & Labeling


Electronics Manufacturing


Life Sciences & Medical


Factory Automation




Resources





Case Studies


White Papers


Videos


Webinars


Know Your Tech


Products & Applications




Support





Services


Download Center


Tech Support Self-Help


Product Warranty


Terms and Conditions


Quality & Environmental Management System


Helpdesk Request




Blog


Make Barcodes


Company





Office Locations


How To Buy


Supplier Information


Terms and Conditions


Company News


Legacy of Innovation


Events


Recognition


Contact Us


Careers


Integrator Alliance


Prospective Partners


Parent Company


Photo Galleries


Product Catalog


Privacy Policy









                        中国
                        




                        English
                        




                        Français
                        




                        Deutsch
                        




                        Español
                        













Free Barcode Generator







Thank you for using Microscan’s Barcode Generator. Please note: Barcodes are for testing purposes only. Microscan implies no guarantee for any code created on this website.

















﻿







Barcode Generator



































Microscan introduces new Professional Services offerings, enabling customers access to advanced product support options.







Products





Laser Barcode Scanners


2D Barcode Readers


Handheld Barcode Readers


Barcode Verification 


Print Quality Inspection Systems


Machine Vision Systems


Engineered Solutions


Barcode Software and Connectivity


NERLITE Machine Vision Lighting


Auto ID Accessories


Machine Vision Accessories


Legacy Products




Industries





Packaging & Labeling


Electronics Manufacturing


Life Sciences & Medical


Factory Automation




Resources





Case Studies


White Papers


Videos


Webinars


Know Your Tech


Products & Applications




Support





Services


Download Center


Tech Support Self-Help


Product Warranty


Terms and Conditions


Quality & Environmental Management System


Helpdesk Request




Blog


Make Barcodes


Company





Office Locations


How To Buy


Supplier Information


Terms and Conditions


Company News


Legacy of Innovation


Events


Recognition


Contact Us


Careers


Integrator Alliance


Prospective Partners


Parent Company


Photo Galleries


Product Catalog


Privacy Policy









                        中国
                        




                        English
                        




                        Français
                        




                        Deutsch
                        




                        Español
                        













Free Barcode Generator







Thank you for using Microscan’s Barcode Generator. Please note: Barcodes are for testing purposes only. Microscan implies no guarantee for any code created on this website.



































US Federal Circuit Opinions and Cases | FindLaw

























Not a Legal Professional?  Visit our consumer site

Register | Login
Welcome.Edit Your Profile | Log Out
Javascript is disabled. Please enable Javascript to log in.







Search




Cases & Codes
Practice Management
Jobs & Careers
Newsletters
Blogs
Law Technology




Forms
Lawyer Marketing
Corporate Counsel
Law Students
JusticeMail
Reference





















FindLaw
Caselaw
United States
US Fed. Cir.


United States Federal Circuit Cases
Welcome to FindLaw's searchable database of United States Federal Circuit decisions since January 1995.  
    FindLaw offers a free 
RSS feed for this court. We also maintain an archive of 
    Opinion Summaries from September 2000 to the Present. 
    Cases are browsable by date and searchable by docket number, case title, and full text. 




Party Name Search
Free Text Search
Search by Docket Number
	        
Browse by Court







 
SEARCHING US Federal Circuit




Party name: 


 


Date Range: 


                      to 
Format is YYYYMMDD


 












 
SEARCHING US Federal Circuit




Text: 






Date Range: 


                      to 
Format is YYYYMMDD


 














 
SEARCHING US Federal Circuit




Docket Number:






Date Range: 

                        to 
Format is YYYYMMDD


 










Federal Courts
United States Supreme Court
1st Circuit Court of Appeals
2nd Circuit Court of Appeals
3rd Circuit Court of Appeals
4th Circuit Court of Appeals
5th Circuit Court of Appeals
6th Circuit Court of Appeals
7th Circuit Court of Appeals
8th Circuit Court of Appeals
 9th Circuit Court of Appeals
10th Circuit Court of Appeals
11th Circuit Court of Appeals
D.C. Circuit Court of Appeals
D.C. Court of Appeals
Federal Circuit Court of Appeals


State Courts
California Supreme Court
Court of Appeals of New York
Supreme Court of Texas
Supreme Court of Florida
Supreme Court of Illinois
Supreme Court of Delaware
Supreme Court of New Jersey
Supreme Court of Ohio
Supreme Court of Minnesota
Supreme Court of Colorado









Browse by Recent Decisions


Description
Date
Docket #


Soft Gel Technologies, Inc. v. Jarrow Formulas, Inc.
July 26, 2017
16-1814

SOFT GEL TECHNOLOGIES INC v. JARROW FORMULAS INC SOFT GEL TECHNOLOGIES INC
July 26, 2017
2016-1814 
 2016-1815 
 2017-1051

SPHERIX INCORPORATED v. JOSEPH MATAL PERFORMING THE FUNCTIONS DUTIES OF THE UNDER SECRETARY OF COMMERCE FOR INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY AND DIRECTOR PATENT AND TRADEMARK OFFICE
July 25, 2017
2016-1790

NETLIST INC v. DIABLO TECHNOLOGIES INC
July 25, 2017
2016-1742 
 2016-1743 
 2016-1744

HOME SEMICONDUCTOR CORPORATION v. SAMSUNG ELECTRONICS CO LTD SAMSUNG ELECTRONICS AMERICA INC SAMSUNG SEMICONDUCTOR INC SAMSUNG AUSTIN SEMICONDUCTOR LLC
July 25, 2017
2016-2215



View more decisions »





Browse United States Federal Circuit Opinions

Browse opinions by calendar year:


2017

JAN


FEB


MAR


APR


MAY


JUN


JUL


AUG


SEP


OCT


NOV


DEC



2016

JAN


FEB


MAR


APR


MAY


JUN


JUL


AUG


SEP


OCT


NOV


DEC



2015

JAN


FEB


MAR


APR


MAY


JUN


JUL


AUG


SEP


OCT


NOV


DEC



2014

JAN


FEB


MAR


APR


MAY


JUN


JUL


AUG


SEP


OCT


NOV


DEC



2013

JAN


FEB


MAR


APR


MAY


JUN


JUL


AUG


SEP


OCT


NOV


DEC


View more years »


















FindLaw Career Center





Attorney
Corporate Counsel
Academic
Judicial Clerk
Summer Associate
Intern
Law Librarian
Paralegal
Legal Secretary
Law Enforcement
District Attorney
Legal Investigator
Compliance Officer
Investment Banker
Business Development



                Post a Job  |  View More Jobs 



View More

































Research the law
Manage your practice
Manage your career
News and commentary
Get Legal Forms
About us
Find Us On



Cases & Codes / Opinion Summaries / Sample Business Contracts / Research An Attorney or Law Firm
Law Technology / Law Practice Management / Law Firm Marketing Services / Corporate Counsel Center
Legal Career Job Search / Online CLE / Law Student Resources
Law Commentary / Featured Documents / Newsletters / Blogs / RSS Feeds
Legal Forms for Your Practice
Company History / Media Relations / Contact Us / Privacy / Advertising / Jobs







Copyright © Fri Jul 28 08:19:36 PDT 2017 FindLaw, a Thomson Reuters business. All rights reserved.





